Tennessee, session 114, HB1663.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-3-503, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(g)
(1) A person or entity that operates a family child care home and obtains
a United States department of defense certificate to operate, pursuant to 32 CFR
79.6, is not subject to licensure and does not require an exemption from licensing
to operate lawfully as long as such family child care home provides child care
services only to an eligible patron.
(2) As used in this subsection (g),"eligible patron" has the same meaning
as defined in 32 CFR 79.3.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1663
010573
- 1 -